Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF846.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Special education apprenticeship programs. new text end new text begin (a) For grants to intermediate school districts for registered special education apprenticeship programs: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 3,000,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 3,000,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) In each year, the department must award grants of $740,000 each to Intermediate School Districts Nos. 287, 288, 916, and 917. Grant recipients must use grant money for registered special education apprenticeship programs. Grant money may be used for: new text end new text begin (1) program oversight and administrative costs incurred by an intermediate school district and its partner higher education institution; new text end new text begin (2) stipends and tuition, fees, and other direct program costs incurred by apprentices; new text end new text begin (3) stipends for teachers serving as mentors; and new text end new text begin (4) the cost of substitute teachers. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, up to $40,000 of the appropriation is available for grant administration. new text end